Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-684
Person charged with traffic infraction; citation; refusal to sign; penalty.

Whenever any person is charged with a traffic infraction, such person shall be issued a citation pursuant to the provisions of section 29-424. Any person who refuses to sign the citation shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished as provided by the provisions of section 29-426.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 105;

Laws 1974, LB 829, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,105;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 180.